dictionaries/ru-ru.aff
SFX J Y 37
SFX J   Ø    Ñ            Ø
SFX J   Ø    ÅÍ           Ø
SFX J   Ø    Å            Ø
SFX J   Ø    À            Ø
SFX J   Ï    Õ            Ï
SFX J   Ï    Å            Ï
SFX J   Ï    Á            Ï
SFX J   Ê    Ñ            Ê
SFX J   Ê    É            ÉÊ
SFX J   Ê    ÅÍ           Ê
SFX J   Ê    Å            [^É]Ê
SFX J   Ê    À            Ê
SFX J   Å    Õ            [ÃÖÛÝ]Å
SFX J   Å    Ñ            [^ÃÖÛÝ]Å
SFX J   Å    É            ÉÅ
SFX J   Å    Á            [ÃÖÛÝ]Å
SFX J   Å    À            [^ÃÖÛÝ]Å
SFX J   £Ö   ÅÖÕ          £Ö
SFX J   £Ö   ÅÖÅ          £Ö
SFX J   £Ö   ÅÖÁ          £Ö
SFX J   £    Ñ            £
SFX J   £    Å            Ø£
SFX J   £    À            £
SFX J   0    Õ            [^ÅÊÏØ]
SFX J   0    Õ            [^£ÅÊÏÖØ]
SFX J   0    Õ            [^£]Ö
SFX J   0    ÏÍ           [^ÃÅÊÏÖØÛÝÞ]
SFX J   0    ÏÍ           [^£ÃÅÊÏÖØÛÝÞ]
SFX J   0    Í            Ï
SFX J   0    Í            Å
SFX J   0    Í            [£Å]
SFX J   0    Å            [^ÅÊÏØ]
SFX J   0    Å            [^£ÅÊÏÖØ]
SFX J   0    Å            [^£]Ö
SFX J   0    Á            [^ÅÊÏØ]
SFX J   0    Á            [^£ÅÊÏÖØ]
SFX J   0    Á            [^£]Ö

SFX I Y 30
SFX I   ØÎÑ  ÅÎ           ØÎÑ
SFX I   ØËÁ  ÅË           ØËÁ
SFX I   Ñ    Ø            [ÁÅÉÏÑÕÙ]ÎÑ
SFX I   Ñ    Ê            [ÅÉÕ]Ñ
SFX I   Ñ    É            Ñ
SFX I   Ñ    ÅÊ           Ñ
SFX I   Ñ    ÅÀ           Ñ
SFX I   Ñ    Å            [^É]Ñ
SFX I   Ñ    À            Ñ
SFX I   ÎÑ   ÅÎ           [^ÁÅÉÊÏÑÕØÙÚ]ÎÑ
SFX I   ËÁ   ÏË           [^ÀÁÃÅÉÊÏÑÕÖØÙÛÞ]ËÁ
SFX I   ËÁ   Ë            [ÀÁÅÉÏÑÕÙ]ËÁ
SFX I   ËÁ   ÅË           [ÃÖÛÞ]ËÁ
SFX I   ÊÎÑ  ÅÎ           ÊÎÑ
SFX I   ÊËÁ  ÅË           ÊËÁ
SFX I   Á    Ù            [^ÇÈËÖÛÝÞ]Á
SFX I   Á    Õ            Á
SFX I   Á    ÏÊ           [^ÃÖÛÝÞ]Á
SFX I   Á    ÏÀ           [^ÃÖÛÝÞ]Á
SFX I   Á    É            [ÇÈËÖÛÝÞ]Á
SFX I   Á    ÅÊ           [ÃÛÝÞ]Á
SFX I   Á    ÅÀ           [ÃÛÝÞ]Á
SFX I   Á    Å            Á
SFX I   Á    0            [^Ë]Á
SFX I   0    ÍÉ           Ñ
SFX I   0    ÍÉ           Á
SFX I   0    Í            Ñ
SFX I   0    Í            Á
SFX I   0    È            Ñ
SFX I   0    È            Á

SFX H Y 14
SFX H   Ñ    É            Ñ
SFX H   Ñ    ÅÊ           Ñ
SFX H   Ñ    ÅÀ           Ñ
SFX H   Ñ    Å            [^É]Ñ
SFX H   Ñ    À            Ñ
SFX H   Ê    À            [ÅÏ]Ê
SFX H   Á    Ù            [^ÇÈËÖÛÝÞ]Á
SFX H   Á    Õ            Á
SFX H   Á    ÏÊ           [^ÃÖÛÝÞ]Á
SFX H   Á    ÏÀ           [^ÃÖÛÝÞ]Á
SFX H   Á    É            [ÇÈËÖÛÝÞ]Á
SFX H   Á    ÅÊ           ÝÁ
SFX H   Á    ÅÀ           ÝÁ
SFX H   Á    Å            Á

SFX G Y 52
SFX G   ÙÊ   ÏÍÕ          ÙÊ
SFX G   ÙÊ   ÏÍ           ÙÊ
SFX G   ÙÊ   ÏÇÏ          ÙÊ
SFX G   ØÎÑ  ÅÎ           ØÎÑ
SFX G   Ø    ÑÍÉ          Ø
SFX G   Ø    ÑÍ           Ø
SFX G   Ø    ÑÈ           Ø
SFX G   Ø    Ñ            Ø
SFX G   Ø    É            Ø
SFX G   Ø    ÅÍ           Ø
SFX G   Ø    ÅÊ           Ø
SFX G   Ø    Å            Ø
SFX G   Ø    À            Ø
SFX G   Ø    £Í           Ø
SFX G   Ñ    Ø            [ÁÅÉÏÕÙ]ÎÑ
SFX G   Ñ    Ê            [ÅÉÕ]Ñ
SFX G   Ñ    É            Ñ
SFX G   Ñ    ÅÊ           Ñ
SFX G   Ñ    ÅÀ           Ñ
SFX G   Ñ    Å            [^É]Ñ
SFX G   Ñ    À            Ñ
SFX G   Ñ    £Ê           Ñ
SFX G   Ñ    £À           Ñ
SFX G   ÏË   ËÕ           ÏË
SFX G   ÏË   ËÏÍ          ÏË
SFX G   ÏË   ËÅ           ÏË
SFX G   ÏË   ËÁ           ÏË
SFX G   ÏÊ   ÉÍ           ÏÊ
SFX G   ÎÑ   ÅÎ           [^ÁÅÉÊÏÕØÙÚ]ÎÑ
SFX G   ÊÎÑ  ÅÎ           ÊÎÑ
SFX G   Ê    ÍÕ           ÏÊ
SFX G   Ê    Í            ÙÊ
SFX G   Ê    Í            ÏÊ
SFX G   Ê    Í            ÉÊ
SFX G   Ê    ÇÏ           ÏÊ
SFX G   ÉÊ   ÏÍÕ          ÉÊ
SFX G   ÉÊ   ÏÍ           ÉÊ
SFX G   ÉÊ   ÏÇÏ          ÉÊ
SFX G   ÅË   ËÕ           ÅË
SFX G   ÅË   ËÏÍ          ÅË
SFX G   ÅË   ËÅ           ÅË
SFX G   ÅË   ËÁ           ÅË
SFX G   ÅÃ   ÃÕ           ÅÃ
SFX G   ÅÃ   ÃÅ           ÅÃ
SFX G   ÅÃ   ÃÁ           ÅÃ
SFX G   0    ÙÍ           [^ÃÅÊËÏÑÖØÛÝÞ]
SFX G   0    Õ            [^ÃÅÊËÏÑØ]
SFX G   0    ÍÉ           Ñ
SFX G   0    Í            Ñ
SFX G   0    È            Ñ
SFX G   0    Å            [^ÃÅÊËÏÑØ]
SFX G   0    Á            [^ÃÅÊËÏÑØ]

SFX F Y 25
SFX F   Ø    É            Ø
SFX F   ÏÎÏË ÁÔÁÍÉ        ÏÎÏË
SFX F   ÏÎÏË ÁÔÁÍ         ÏÎÏË
SFX F   ÏÎÏË ÁÔÁÈ         ÏÎÏË
SFX F   ÏÎÏË ÁÔÁ          ÏÎÏË
SFX F   ÏÎÏË ÁÔ           ÏÎÏË
SFX F   ÏË   ËÕ           ÎÏË
SFX F   ÏË   ËÏÍ          ÎÏË
SFX F   ÏË   ËÅ           ÎÏË
SFX F   ÏË   ËÁ           ÎÏË
SFX F   ÅÎÏË ÑÔÁÍÉ        ÅÎÏË
SFX F   ÅÎÏË ÑÔÁÍ         ÅÎÏË
SFX F   ÅÎÏË ÑÔÁÈ         ÅÎÏË
SFX F   ÅÎÏË ÑÔÁ          ÅÎÏË
SFX F   ÅÎÏË ÑÔ           ÅÎÏË
SFX F   ÁÑ   ÕÀ           ÁÑ
SFX F   ÁÑ   ÏÊ           ÁÑ
SFX F   Á    Õ            Á
SFX F   Á    ÏÊ           Á
SFX F   £ÎÏË ÑÔÁÍÉ        £ÎÏË
SFX F   £ÎÏË ÑÔÁÍ         £ÎÏË
SFX F   £ÎÏË ÑÔÁÈ         £ÎÏË
SFX F   £ÎÏË ÑÔÁ          £ÎÏË
SFX F   £ÎÏË ÑÔ           £ÎÏË
SFX F   0    À            Ø

SFX E Y 15
SFX E   ÙÊ   ÅÊ           ÙÊ
SFX E   ÙÊ   ÅÅ           ÙÊ
SFX E   Ø    Ñ            Ø
SFX E   Ø    ÅÍ           Ø
SFX E   Ø    Å            Ø
SFX E   Ø    À            Ø
SFX E   Ø    £Í           Ø
SFX E   Ñ    É            Ñ
SFX E   Ñ    ÅÊ           Ñ
SFX E   Ñ    ÅÀ           Ñ
SFX E   Ñ    Å            [^É]Ñ
SFX E   Ñ    À            Ñ
SFX E   Ñ    £Ê           Ñ
SFX E   Ñ    £À           Ñ
SFX E   Å    Ê            ÅÅ

SFX D Y 5
SFX D   ØÓÑ  ÓÑ           ÉÔØÓÑ
SFX D   ÔØÓÑ ÅÔÓÑ         [ÁÑ]ÔØÓÑ
SFX D   ÔØÓÑ ÀÔÓÑ         [ÁÑ]ÔØÓÑ
SFX D   ÉÔØÓÑ ÑÔÓÑ         [^ÖÛÝÞ]ÉÔØÓÑ
SFX D   ÉÔØÓÑ ÁÔÓÑ         [ÖÛÝÞ]ÉÔØÓÑ

SFX B Y 25
SFX B   ÙÔØÓÑ ÏÊÔÅÓØ       ÙÔØÓÑ
SFX B   ÙÔØÓÑ ÏÊÓÑ         ÙÔØÓÑ
SFX B   ÙÔØ  ÏÊÔÅ         ÙÔØ
SFX B   ÙÔØ  ÏÊ           ÙÔØ
SFX B   Ø    Å            ÉÔØ
SFX B   ÕÔØÓÑ ÉÔÅÓØ        ÕÔØÓÑ
SFX B   ÕÔØÓÑ ÉÓØ          ÕÔØÓÑ
SFX B   ÕÔØ  ÉÔÅ          ÕÔØ
SFX B   ÕÔØ  É            ÕÔØ
SFX B   ÔØÓÑ ÔÅÓØ         ÉÔØÓÑ
SFX B   ÔØÓÑ ÓØ           ÉÔØÓÑ
SFX B   ÔØÓÑ ÊÔÅÓØ        [ÁÅÑ]ÔØÓÑ
SFX B   ÔØÓÑ ÊÓÑ          [ÁÅÑ]ÔØÓÑ
SFX B   ÔØ   ÊÔÅ          [ÁÅÑ]ÔØ
SFX B   ÔØ   Ê            [ÁÅÑ]ÔØ
SFX B   ÓØ   ÔÅÓØ         ÉÓØ
SFX B   ÓÑ   ÔÅÓØ         ÊÓÑ
SFX B   ÓÑ   ÔÅÓØ         [^Ô]ØÓÑ
SFX B   ÏÔØÓÑ ÉÔÅÓØ        ÏÔØÓÑ
SFX B   ÏÔØÓÑ ÉÓØ          ÏÔØÓÑ
SFX B   ÏÔØ  ÉÔÅ          ÏÔØ
SFX B   ÏÔØ  É            ÏÔØ
SFX B   ÉÔØ  É            ÉÔØ
SFX B   0    ÔÅ           [ÉÊ]
SFX B   0    ÔÅ           [^ÓÔ]Ø
